Utah statutes.
76-10-509.6.   Parent or guardian providing firearm to violent minor.

(1)  A parent or guardian may not intentionally or knowingly provide a firearm to, or permit the possession of a firearm by, any minor who has been convicted of a violent felony as defined in Section 76-3-203.5 or any minor who has been adjudicated in juvenile court for an offense which would constitute a violent felony if the minor were an adult.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of:

(a)  a class A misdemeanor upon the first offense; and

(b)  a third degree felony for each subsequent offense.



Amended by Chapter 303, 2000 General Session

